District of Columbia statutes.
42-2851.08

Determination of qualified areas.

Within 30 days after April 19, 2002, the Mayor shall issue a notice of proposed rulemaking setting forth those census tracts which are preliminarily determined to be qualified areas. The Mayor shall issue a notice of final rulemaking setting forth those census tracts which are determined to be qualified areas within 75 days after April 19, 2002. The Mayor shall make a map of the qualified areas, a list of the census tracts determined to be qualified areas, and the boundaries of those tracts available on the Internet. The Mayor shall review and, if necessary, update the map, list, and boundaries at least once every 2 years.

History

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 208, 49 DCR 1468